el: Τύπος snowmobile: Βουνού; Απόδοση; Περιήγησης; Utility; Για νέους; Άλλο
cs: Typ sněžného skútru: Horský; Vysoký výkon; Cestovní; Užitkový; Pro mladé; Jiné
fi: Moottorikelkkatyyppi: Vuoristoinen; Performance; Touring; Hyötykäyttö; Nuoret; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de moto de neve: Montanha; Desempenho; Passeio; Utilitário; Jovem; Outro
ro-RO: Tip snowmobil: Montan; Performanță; Touring; Utility; Youth; Altele
zh-CN: 雪地机动车类型: 山地; 高性能; 旅行胎; 多功能型; 青少年; 其他
es: Tipo de moto de nieve: Montaña; Rendimiento; Turismo; Utilidad; Juvenil; Otros
zh-TW: 摩托雪橇類型: 山; 性能; 旅行; 多功能; 青少年; 其他
sk-SK: Typ snežného skútra: Hora; Výkon; Touring; Úžitkový; Pre mladých; Iné
nb: Snøscootertype: Fjell; Ytelse; Tur; Nytte; Ungdom; Annet
da: Snescootertype: Bjerg; Performance; Touring; Utility; Ungdom; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta motornih sanjki: Planinski; Performansa; Obilazak; Uslužni; Za mlade; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de mota de neve: Montanha; Desempenho; Passeio; Utilitário; Juventude; Outro
tr: Kar Aracı Tipi: Dağ; Performans; Touring; İşlevsel; Gençlik; Diğer
pl: Typ skutera śnieżnego: Górski; Stopa zwrotu; Na trasy; Użyteczność; Młodzież; Inne
de: Schneemobiltyp: Berg; Leistung; Touring; Utility; Jugend; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta motornih sani: Gorski; Učinkovitost; Turing; Uporabnost; Mladina; Drugo
nl: Sneeuwscootertype: Berg; Prestaties; Toeren; Hulpmiddel; Jeugd; Andere
bg-BG: Тип моторна шейна: Планина; Производителност; Туринг; Помощна; Младост; Други
en: Snowmobile type: Mountain; Performance; Touring; Utility; Youth; Other
ru: Тип снегохода: Горный; Мощный; Туристический; Утилитарный; Молодежный; Другой
ja: スノーモービルの種類: マウンテン; パフォーマンス; ツーリング; ユーティリティ; ユース; その他
it: Tipo di motoslitta: Montagna; Prestazioni; Da viaggio; Utility; Giovani; Altro
ko: 스노모빌 유형: 산악; 퍼포먼스; 투어링; 유틸리티; 유소년; 기타
hu: Motorosszán típusa: Hegyi; Teljesítmény; Túrázó; Segéd; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
fr: Type de motoneige: Montagne; Performance; Tourisme; Utilitaire; Jeunesse; Autre
lt-LT: Sniego motociklo tipas: Kalnų; Našumas; Laisvalaikio; „Utility“ (atstumo); Jaunuoliams; Kita
sv: Typ av snöskoter: Fjäll; Prestanda; Touring; Verktyg; Ungdom; Övrigt
vi: Loại xe trượt tuyết: Núi; Hiệu suất; Lốp đi phượt; Tiện ích; Thiếu niên; Khác
th: ประเภทสโนว์โมบิล: ภูเขา; สมรรถนะสูง; ทัวริ่ง; อเนกประสงค์; สำหรับเด็ก; อื่นๆ